California statutes. Education Code
The office of the Governor is hereby vested with authority to prepare and submit any state plan required by said section of said act of Congress, to prepare and submit amendments to such state plan, and to administer such state plan or amendments thereto, in accordance with said act of Congress, and any rules and regulations adopted thereunder. Any such state plan or amendment thereto prepared by the office of the Governor shall be subject to the approval of the
 Department of Finance.

The office of the Governor is hereby vested with all necessary power and authority to cooperate with the government of the United States, or any agency or agencies thereof in the administration of the act of Congress and the rules and regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.5. Title 38 Awards [67100. - 67104.]

67100.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Sections 21.4253 and 21.4254 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations require a postsecondary educational institution headquartered or operating in California desiring to enroll veterans or persons eligible for Title 38 awards in accredited and nonaccredited institutions and programs to make application for approval of these courses to the California State Approving Agency for Veterans Education, commonly known as CSAAVE, as the state approving agency legally designated pursuant to Section 3671 of Subchapter I of Chapter 36 of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(b) Sections 21.4253 and 21.4254 authorize CSAAVE to approve
 the application of the accredited and nonaccredited institutions when the school and its accredited and nonaccredited courses satisfy the criteria provided in Sections 21.4253 and 21.4254 and additional reasonable criteria established by CSAAVE.

(c) It is reasonable pursuant to Sections 21.4253 and 21.4254 for CSAAVE to require a postsecondary educational institution, public or private, to obtain accreditation for its degree programs, to comply with all federal and state laws and regulations, and to comply with any additional reasonable criteria established by CSAAVE. It is reasonable pursuant to Sections 21.4253 and 21.4254 for CSAAVE to require a private postsecondary institution to be issued an approval to operate from the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   (SB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

67101.

The Title 38 Funding Program is hereby established, under the administration of the California State Approving Agency for Veterans Education. The California State Approving Agency for Veterans Education shall approve qualifying institutions desiring to enroll veterans or persons eligible for Title 38 awards in accordance with federal law, this chapter, and other reasonable criteria established by the California State Approving Agency for Veterans Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 676, Sec. 1.   (AB 2099)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

67102.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) An “academic year” is July 1 to June 30, inclusive. The starting date of a session shall determine the academic year in which it is included.

(b) “CSAAVE” is the California State Approving Agency for Veterans Education.

(c) (1) “Qualifying institution” means a degree-granting institution that complies with paragraphs (2), (3), and (4), or a non-degree-granting institution that complies with paragraphs (2) and (4).

(2) (A) The institution shall provide information on where to
 access California license examination passage rates for the most recent available year from graduates of its undergraduate programs leading to employment for which passage of a California licensing examination is required, if that data is electronically available through the Internet Web site of a California licensing or regulatory agency. For purposes of this paragraph, “provide” may exclusively include placement of an Internet Web site address labeled as an access point for the data on the passage rates of recent program graduates on the Internet Web site where enrollment information is also located, on an Internet Web site that provides centralized admissions information for postsecondary educational systems with multiple campuses, or on applications for enrollment or other program information distributed to prospective students.

(B) The institution shall be responsible for certifying to CSAAVE compliance with the requirements of
 subparagraph (A).

(3) (A) A degree-granting institution shall provide evidence of accreditation of the institution and of all degree programs to CSAAVE. The accrediting agency shall be recognized by the United States Department of Education. An unaccredited degree-granting institution participating in the Title 38 award program on January 1, 2015, shall satisfy both of the following to remain eligible to receive Title 38 awards:

(i) The institution shall obtain and provide evidence to CSAAVE of its candidacy or preaccreditation status, with an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, by January 1, 2016, for the institution to be eligible for Title 38 awards for the academic year of 2015–16 or 2016–17, or both.

(ii) The institution shall obtain and provide
 evidence to CSAAVE of accreditation from the accrediting agency with which it had candidacy or preaccreditation status by January 1, 2017, for the institution to be eligible for Title 38 awards for the academic year of 2017–18, and each academic year thereafter.

(B) If an unaccredited degree-granting institution participating in the Title 38 award program fails to satisfy the accreditation requirements provided in clause (i) of subparagraph (A), a veteran enrolled in a degree program offered by the institution prior to January 1, 2016, shall remain eligible for Title 38 awards through his or her completion of that degree program. If an unaccredited degree-granting institution participating in the Title 38 award program fails to satisfy the accreditation requirements provided in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A), a veteran enrolled in a degree program offered by the institution prior to January 1, 2017, shall remain eligible for Title 38 awards
 through his or her completion of that degree program.

(C) An unaccredited degree-granting institution that does not satisfy the accreditation requirements provided in clause (i) of subparagraph (A), shall not enroll any new Title 38 eligible students to any of its degree programs after January 1, 2016. An unaccredited degree-granting institution that does not satisfy the accreditation requirements provided in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A), shall not enroll any new Title 38 students to any of its degree programs after January 1, 2017, without first providing these prospective students with the following written disclosure:
“If you choose to attend this institution, you will not be eligible to receive a Title 38 award because this institution did not satisfy one or more of the accreditation requirements to receive Title 38 awards.”
(D) An institution that obtains and provides evidence to CSAAVE of accreditation from the Committee of Bar Examiners pursuant to Sections 6046.7 and 6060.6 of the Business and Professions Code does not have to comply with subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), if the institution complies with both of the following:

(i) (I) The institution provides disclosures to applicants of the school of the institution’s admissions data, tuition, fees, financial aid, conditional scholarships, refund policies, average class size of each required course, number of clinical offerings, number of full-time and
 part-time faculty, technically trained librarians, and administrators, enrollment data, bar passage data, and employment outcomes for graduates.

(II) For purposes of this clause, CSAAVE may develop a standardized information report template or use a standardized information report template developed by the State Bar.

(III) For purposes of this clause, the following terms have the following meanings:

(ia) “Admissions data” means information from the most recently enrolled fall semester class including the total number of applications, the total number of accepted students, and the 75th, 50th, and 25th percentile scores for the undergraduate grade point averages and law school admission test scores of admitted students.

(ib) “Bar passage data” means the
 most current cumulative bar pass rates defined and reported by the examining committee of the State Bar.

(ic) “Conditional scholarship” means any financial aid award, the retention of which is dependent upon the student maintaining a minimum grade point average or class standing other than that ordinarily required to remain in good academic standing.

(id) “Employment outcomes for graduates” means the results of a survey by the law school, taken three years after graduation, that breaks down the employment rate of graduates in each of the first three years after graduation, including the rate of employment of graduates in jobs where a juris doctor degree is required by the employer and the rate of employment of graduates in jobs where a juris doctor degree is an advantage in employment.

(ie) “Enrollment data” means
 information about the number of students who are admitted to the school per class per year for the past three years, the number of students who transfer to and from the school per class per year for the past three years, and the number of students who do not continue to attend the school each year for the past three years on either a voluntary or involuntary basis.

(ii) The institution is in compliance with all applicable CSAAVE rules and regulations and is in good standing with the Committee of Bar Examiners.

(4) The institution shall be one of the following to be eligible for Title 38 awards:

(A) A campus of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California.

(B) An independent institution of higher
 education, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010.

(C) (i) For purposes of the 2015–16 award year, a private postsecondary educational institution, as defined in Section 94858.

(ii) For purposes of the 2016–17 award year, and every award year thereafter, a private postsecondary educational institution, as defined in Section 94858, that has an approval to operate from the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, is subject to the regulatory oversight and enforcement of student protections provided by the bureau, and has its approval to operate certified by CSAAVE.

(D) An institution described in subdivision (i) of Section 94874 that satisfies all of the requirements provided in Section 94947.

(E) An institution that is
 accredited by the Committee of Bar Examiners pursuant to Sections 6046.7 and 6060.7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 45.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

67102.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2024, CSAAVE shall establish regulations requiring postsecondary educational institutions to provide the following information to CSAAVE as part of an application for approval or renewal:

(1) The institution’s most recent cohort default rate as reported to the United States Department of Education.

(2) For institutions other than the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges, evidence that the institution meets financial responsibility requirements that shall be established by CSAAVE.

(3) Evidence of the institution’s accreditation status.

(4) Whether a student, former student, or public prosecutor has filed a lawsuit against the institution for fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit within five years before the institution’s application for approval or renewal, including both pending and resolved lawsuits.

(5) If the institution makes an implied or express representation that it prepares students to work in a profession, occupation, trade, or career field requiring licensure or certification by the state, the following information shall also be disclosed:

(A) Whether the institution has obtained a required approval by the appropriate state licensing or certifying agency for the profession, occupation, trade, or career field.

(B) Whether the institution meets all requirements necessary to allow
 a student to lawfully obtain a state license or certificate.

(C) The license or certificate passage rate for each program.

(D) An employment market assessment for nondegree programs.

(b) To the extent that a School Performance Fact Sheet accepted by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education pursuant to Section 94910, documents submitted to the United States Department of Education, documents submitted to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or previously submitted applications to CSAAVE contain information required by this section or a CSAAVE application, the institution may provide, as part of the application, a copy of the information previously submitted or a reference, including, but not limited to, an internet website link, to the fact sheet or documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 44.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

67103.

CSAAVE shall do all of the following:

(a) Notify initial Title 38 recipients seeking to attend, or attending, an institution that is ineligible for Title 38 awards under this chapter that the institution is ineligible for Title 38 awards for the academic year for which the student received a Title 38 award.

(b) Provide initial and renewal Title 38 recipients seeking to attend, or attending, an institution that is ineligible for Title 38 awards at the institution under this chapter with a complete list of all California postsecondary educational institutions at which the student would be eligible to receive a Title 38 award.

(c) Commencing for purposes of the 2016–17 award year, and every award year thereafter, certify whether a private postsecondary educational institution has been issued an approval to operate from the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 676, Sec. 1.   (AB 2099)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

67104.

Compliance with this chapter, in and of itself, shall not be construed as satisfying the requirements for participation in programs authorized by the federal Higher Education Act, including, but not limited to, Section 600.9 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 676, Sec. 1.   (AB 2099)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Disabled Student Services [67300. - 67313.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [67300. - 67302.5.]

67300.

Services for disabled students provided by the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and services provided for the University of California may, at a minimum, conform to the level and quality of those services provided by the Department of Rehabilitation to its clients prior to July 1, 1981. However, nothing in this chapter requires the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California to provide the services for disabled students in the same manner as those services were provided by the Department of Rehabilitation.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Trustees of the California State University shall, for their respective systems, and the Regents of the University of California may adopt regulations to implement this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or Section 67305, blind students who are attending California Community Colleges under the sponsorship of the Department of Rehabilitation shall have all reader services provided directly by the Department of Rehabilitation. Reader services provided by the Department of Rehabilitation pursuant to this section shall be furnished in accordance with federal and state law. The Department of Rehabilitation shall seek federal funds for the provision of readers to blind students pursuant to this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

67301.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California may, adopt rules and regulations prescribing requirements similar to those provided by Section 22511.5 of the Vehicle Code and all other applicable sections of the Vehicle Code relating to parking exemptions for disabled persons, as defined by Section 295.5 of the Vehicle Code, and disabled veterans, as defined by Section 295.7 of the Vehicle Code. The rules and regulations shall include authorization to park for unlimited periods in time-restricted parking zones and to park in any metered parking space without being required to pay any parking meter fee or to display a parking permit other than pursuant to Section 5007 or 22511.55 of the Vehicle Code, provided those spaces are otherwise available for use by the general public. The adopted regulations shall authorize parking at campus facilities and grounds by students with disabilities and by persons providing transportation services to students with disabilities. Except as otherwise provided in this section, students with disabilities and persons providing transportation to students with disabilities shall be required to display a valid parking permit, if applicable, for the campus attended. Nothing in this section prohibits the adoption of rules and regulations providing greater accessibility for students with disabilities and persons providing transportation services to those students.

The adopted rules and regulations shall exempt students with disabilities and persons providing transportation services to these persons from any applicable parking restrictions in areas including, but not limited to, metered parking spaces and parking facilities designated for use by students, faculty, administrators, and employees.

(b) The Regents of the University of California may provide, and the Trustees of the California State University shall provide, and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt rules and regulations requiring the governing board of each community college district to provide, visitor parking at each campus of the university or district at no charge for a disabled person, as defined by Section 295.5 of the Vehicle Code, or disabled veteran, as defined by Section 295.7 of the Vehicle Code, or as defined by each segment’s policy concerning the provision of services to students with disabilities, whichever is more inclusive, and for persons providing transportation services to individuals with disabilities. Whenever parking designated for a disabled person is provided on any campus of the University of California, the California State University, or a community college district in a facility controlled by a mechanical gate, that university or district shall also provide accommodations for any person whose disability prevents him or her from operating the gate controls. These accommodations may be provided by making arrangements for disabled persons to be assisted in the operation of the gate controls, or through other effective and reasonable means the university or district may devise. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require the replacement or elimination of special parking facilities restricted for the use of disabled persons located on the campuses of these universities or districts.

It is the intent of the Legislature that community college districts shall utilize the proceeds from parking fees charged to community college students and employees to offset costs incurred by these districts in accommodating disabled persons pursuant to the requirements of this section.

(c) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California may, establish procedures for the purpose of conducting biennial audits to determine whether individual campuses are in compliance with all state building code requirements relating to the location and the designation of minimum percentages of available campus parking spaces for use by students with disabilities, as determined by guidelines of Section 14679 of the Government Code, Section 2-7102 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, Part 40 (commencing with Section 40.1) of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Section 1190.31 of Title 36 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or their successor provisions, or any other applicable provisions of law, whichever provides the greater accessibility for disabled persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 33.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

67302.

(a) An individual, firm, partnership, or corporation that publishes or manufactures printed instructional materials for students attending the University of California, the California State University, or a California Community College, shall provide to the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college, for use by students attending the University of California, the California State University, or a California Community College, any printed instructional material in an electronic format mutually agreed upon by the publisher or manufacturer and the college or campus. Computer files or electronic versions of printed instructional materials shall maintain the structural integrity of the printed instructional material, be
 compatible with commonly used braille translation and speech synthesis software, and include corrections and revisions as may be necessary. The computer files or electronic versions of the printed instructional material shall be provided to the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college at no additional cost and in a timely manner, upon receipt of a written request that does all of the following:

(1) Certifies that the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college has purchased the printed instructional material for use by a student with a disability or that a student with a disability attending or registered to attend that university, college, or particular campus of the university or college has purchased the printed instructional material.

(2) Certifies that the student has a disability that prevents him or her from using
 standard instructional materials.

(3) Certifies that the printed instructional material is for use by the student in connection with a course in which he or she is registered or enrolled at the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college.

(4) Is signed by the coordinator of services for students with disabilities at the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college or by the campus or college official responsible for monitoring compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) at the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college.

(b) An individual, firm, partnership, or corporation specified in subdivision (a) may also require that, in addition to the conditions enumerated above, the request shall include
 a statement signed by the student agreeing to both of the following:

(1) He or she will use the electronic copy of the printed instructional material in specialized format solely for his or her own educational purposes.

(2) He or she will not copy or duplicate the printed instructional material for use by others.

(c) If a college or university permits a student to directly use the electronic version of an instructional material, the disk or file shall be copy-protected, or the college or university shall take other reasonable precautions to ensure that students do not copy or distribute electronic versions of instructional materials in violation of the Copyright Revisions Act of 1976, as amended (17 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.).

(d) An individual, firm,
 partnership, or corporation that publishes or manufactures nonprinted instructional materials for students attending the University of California, the California State University, or a California Community College shall provide computer files or other electronic versions of the nonprinted instructional materials for use by students attending the University of California, the California State University, or a California Community College, subject to the same conditions set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) for printed instructional materials, when technology is available to convert these nonprinted instructional materials to a format that maintains the structural integrity of the nonprinted instructional materials that is compatible with braille translation and speech synthesis software.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Instructional material or materials” means textbooks and
 other materials written and published primarily for use by students in postsecondary instruction that are required or essential to a student’s success in a course of study in which a student with a disability is enrolled. The determination of which materials are “required or essential to student success” shall be made by the instructor of the course in consultation with the official making the request pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) in accordance with guidelines issued pursuant to subdivision (i). “Instructional material or materials” does not include nontextual mathematics and science materials until the time software becomes commercially available that permits the conversion of existing electronic files of the materials into a format that is compatible with braille translation software or alternative media for students with disabilities.

(2) “Printed instructional material or materials” means instructional material or materials
 in book or other printed form.

(3) “Nonprinted instructional materials” means instructional materials in formats other than print, and includes instructional materials that require the availability of electronic equipment in order to be used as a learning resource, including, but not necessarily limited to, software programs, videotapes and audiotapes.

(4) “Structural integrity” means all of the printed instructional material, including, but not limited to, the text of the material, sidebars, the table of contents, chapter headings and subheadings, footnotes, indexes, glossaries, and bibliographies. “Structural integrity” need not include nontextual elements such as pictures, illustrations, graphs, or charts. If good faith efforts fail to produce an agreement pursuant to subdivision (a) between the publisher or manufacturer and the university, college, or particular campus of the
 university or college, as to an electronic format that will preserve the structural integrity of the printed instructional material, the publisher or manufacturer shall provide the instructional material in ASCII text and shall preserve as much of the structural integrity of the printed instructional material as possible.

(5) “Specialized format” means braille, audio, or digital text that is exclusively for use by blind or other persons with disabilities.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a university, college, or particular campus of the university or college from assisting a student with a disability by using the electronic version of printed instructional material provided pursuant to this section solely to transcribe or arrange for the transcription of the printed instructional material into braille. In the event a transcription is made, the campus or
 college shall have the right to share the braille copy of the printed instructional material with other students with disabilities.

(g) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Chancellor of the California State University, and the President of the University of California may each establish one or more centers within their respective segments to process requests for electronic versions of instructional materials pursuant to this section. If a segment establishes a center or centers, and a college or campus within the jurisdiction of the center chooses to participate in the center, each of the following shall apply:

(1) A college or campus designated as within the jurisdiction of a center shall submit requests for instructional material made pursuant to subdivision (a) to the center, which shall transmit the request to the publisher or manufacturer.

(2) If there is more than one center, each center shall make every effort to coordinate requests within its segment.

(3) The publisher or manufacturer of instructional material shall be required to honor and respond to only those requests submitted through a designated center.

(4) If a publisher or manufacturer has responded to a request for instructional materials by a center, or on behalf of all the centers within a segment, all subsequent requests for these instructional materials shall be satisfied by the center to which the request is made.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to authorize any use of instructional materials that would constitute an infringement of copyright under the Copyright Revision Act of 1976, as amended (17 U.S.C. Sec.
 101 et seq.).

(i) The governing boards of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California shall each adopt guidelines consistent with this section for its implementation and administration. At a minimum, the guidelines shall address all of the following:

(1) The designation of materials deemed “required or essential to student success.”

(2) The determination of the availability of technology for the conversion of nonprinted materials pursuant to subdivision (d) and the conversion of mathematics and science materials pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (e).

(3) The procedures and standards relating to distribution of files and materials pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).

(4) Other matters as are deemed necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(j) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall be a violation of Section 54.1 of the Civil Code.

(k) This section does not apply to a request by an institution for a captioned format, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 67302.5, of an instructional material, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 67302.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   (AB 386)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Superseded on operative date of amendment by Stats. 2012, Ch. 621.)
-------------------------------------------

67302.

(a) (1) An individual, firm, partnership, or corporation that publishes or manufactures printed instructional materials for students attending the University of California, the California State University, or a California Community College, shall provide to the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college, for use by students attending the University of California, the California State University, or a California Community College, any printed instructional material in an electronic format mutually agreed upon by the publisher or manufacturer and the college or campus. Computer files or electronic versions of printed instructional materials shall maintain the structural integrity of the printed instructional material, be compatible with
 commonly used braille translation and speech synthesis software, and include corrections and revisions as may be necessary. The computer files or electronic versions of the printed instructional material shall be provided to the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college at no additional cost and in a timely manner, upon receipt of a written request that does all of the following:

(A) Certifies that the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college has purchased the printed instructional material for use by a student with a disability or that a student with a disability attending or registered to attend that university, college, or particular campus of the university or college has purchased the printed instructional material. The requirements of this subparagraph shall be satisfied if the instructional material consists of a digital open source textbook or related materials developed or
 acquired pursuant to Section 66409. 

(B) Certifies that the student has a disability that prevents him or her from using standard instructional materials.

(C) Certifies that the printed instructional material is for use by the student in connection with a course in which he or she is registered or enrolled at the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college.

(D) Is signed by the coordinator of services for students with disabilities at the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college or by the campus or college official responsible for monitoring compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) at the university, college, or particular campus of the university or college.

(2) If and when the California Open Source Digital Library is established pursuant to statute, the request described in paragraph (1) shall be submitted to, and satisfied by, the library where the instructional material needed by a student with a disability is available from that library. 

(b) An individual, firm, partnership, or corporation specified in subdivision (a) may also require that, in addition to the conditions enumerated above, the request shall include a statement signed by the student agreeing to both of the following:

(1) He or she will use the electronic copy of the printed instructional material in specialized format solely for his or her own educational purposes.

(2) He or she will not copy or duplicate the printed
 instructional material for use by others.

(c) If a college or university permits a student to directly use the electronic version of an instructional material, the disk or file shall be copy-protected, or the college or university shall take other reasonable precautions to ensure that students do not copy or distribute electronic versions of instructional materials in violation of the Copyright Revisions Act of 1976, as amended (17 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.).

(d) An individual, firm, partnership, or corporation that publishes or manufactures nonprinted instructional materials for students attending the University of California, the California State University, or a California Community College shall provide computer files or other electronic versions of the nonprinted instructional materials for use by students attending the University of California, the California State University,
 or a California Community College, subject to the same conditions set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) for printed instructional materials, when technology is available to convert these nonprinted instructional materials to a format that maintains the structural integrity of the nonprinted instructional materials that is compatible with braille translation and speech synthesis software.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Instructional material or materials” means textbooks and other materials written and published primarily for use by students in postsecondary instruction, including, but not limited to, digital open source textbooks and related materials developed or acquired pursuant to Section 66409, that are required or essential to a student’s success in a course of study in which a student with a disability is enrolled. The determination of which materials are “required
 or essential to student success” shall be made by the instructor of the course in consultation with the official making the request pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) in accordance with guidelines issued pursuant to subdivision (i). “Instructional material or materials” does not include nontextual mathematics and science materials until the time software becomes commercially available that permits the conversion of existing electronic files of the materials into a format that is compatible with braille translation software or alternative media for students with disabilities.

(2) “Nonprinted instructional materials” means instructional materials in formats other than print, and includes instructional materials that require the availability of electronic equipment in order to be used as a learning resource, including, but not necessarily limited to, software programs, videotapes and audiotapes.

(3) “Printed instructional material or materials” means instructional material or materials in book form or other printed form.

(4) “Specialized format” means braille, audio, or digital text that is exclusively for use by blind persons or other persons with disabilities. 

(5) “Structural integrity” means all of the printed instructional material, including, but not limited to, the text of the material, sidebars, the table of contents, chapter headings and subheadings, footnotes, indexes, glossaries, and bibliographies. “Structural integrity” need not include nontextual elements such as pictures, illustrations, graphs, or charts. If good-faith efforts fail to produce an agreement pursuant to subdivision (a) between the publisher or manufacturer and the university, college, or
 particular campus of the university or college, as to an electronic format that will preserve the structural integrity of the printed instructional material, the publisher or manufacturer shall provide the instructional material in ASCII text and shall preserve as much of the structural integrity of the printed instructional material as possible.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a university, college, or particular campus of the university or college from assisting a student with a disability by using the electronic version of printed instructional material provided pursuant to this section solely to transcribe or arrange for the transcription of the printed instructional material into braille. In the event a transcription is made, the campus or college shall have the right to share the braille copy of the printed instructional material with other students with disabilities.

(g) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Chancellor of the California State University, and the President of the University of California may each establish one or more centers within their respective segments to process requests for electronic versions of instructional materials pursuant to this section. If a segment establishes a center or centers, and a college or campus within the jurisdiction of the center chooses to participate in the center, each of the following shall apply:

(1) A college or campus designated as within the jurisdiction of a center shall submit requests for instructional material made pursuant to subdivision (a) to the center, which shall transmit the request to the publisher or manufacturer.

(2) If there is more than one center, each center shall make every effort to coordinate
 requests within its segment.
